Utah statutes.
64-13a-13 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Purchases of material -- Exemption.

(1)  The Division of Correctional Industries is exempt from the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, in respect to goods or services purchased by or sold to the department.

(2)  The purchase of raw materials for use by the division in manufacturing or processing products for resale is exempt from the powers and duties of the state purchasing agent.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

